Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2205
Medicaid Access and Quality Fund; created; investment.

The Medicaid Access and Quality Fund is created. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2025, LB527, § 5.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.